Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE G. MOTORCYCLES AND ELECTRIC BICYCLES

CHAPTER 664. STANDARDS FOR ELECTRIC BICYCLES

Sec. 664.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Class 1 electric bicycle" means an electric bicycle:

(A) equipped with a motor that assists the rider only when the rider is pedaling; and

(B) with a top assisted speed of 20 miles per hour or less.

(2) "Class 2 electric bicycle" means an electric bicycle:

(A) equipped with a motor that may be used to propel the bicycle without the pedaling of the rider; and

(B) with a top assisted speed of 20 miles per hour or less.

(3) "Class 3 electric bicycle" means an electric bicycle:

(A) equipped with a motor that assists the rider only when the rider is pedaling; and

(B) with a top assisted speed of more than 20 but less than 28 miles per hour.

(4) "Electric bicycle" means a bicycle:

(A) equipped with:

(i) fully operable pedals; and

(ii) an electric motor of fewer than 750 watts; and

(B) with a top assisted speed of 28 miles per hour or less.

(5) "Top assisted speed" means the speed at which the bicycle's motor ceases propelling the bicycle or assisting the rider.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2188), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 664.002. LABELING. (a) A person who manufactures or sells an electric bicycle shall apply a permanent label to the electric bicycle in a prominent location that shows in Arial font in at least 9-point type:

(1) whether the electric bicycle is a Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 electric bicycle;

(2) the top assisted speed of the electric bicycle; and

(3) the motor wattage of the electric bicycle.

(b) A person who changes the motor-powered speed capability or engagement of an electric bicycle shall replace the label required by Subsection (a) to show accurate information about the electric bicycle.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2188), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 664.003. FEDERAL STANDARDS. A person who manufactures or sells an electric bicycle shall ensure that the bicycle complies with the equipment and manufacturing requirements for bicycles adopted by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission under 16 C.F.R. Part 1512.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2188), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 664.004. SPEEDOMETER. A person who manufactures or sells a Class 3 electric bicycle shall ensure that the bicycle is equipped with a speedometer.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2188), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2019.